Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-349
Bonds; sale; proceeds; use.

The proceeds of the sale of bonds, or any of them, shall be used to pay for the works and improvements in the drainage of the district, and such costs, expenses, fees and salaries as may be authorized by law.

Laws 1907, c. 152, § 5, p. 472;

R.S.1913, § 1844;

C.S.1922, § 1791;

C.S.1929, § 31-448;

R.S.1943, § 31-349.